Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE B. TRIAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 15. VENUE

SUBCHAPTER A. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL RULES

Sec. 15.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(a) "Principal office" means a principal office of the corporation, unincorporated association, or partnership in this state in which the decision makers for the organization within this state conduct the daily affairs of the organization. The mere presence of an agency or representative does not establish a principal office.

(b) "Proper venue" means:

(1) the venue required by the mandatory provisions of Subchapter B or another statute prescribing mandatory venue; or

(2) if Subdivision (1) does not apply, the venue provided by this subchapter or Subchapter C.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.002. VENUE: GENERAL RULE. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter or Subchapter B or C, all lawsuits shall be brought:

(1) in the county in which all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred;

(2) in the county of defendant's residence at the time the cause of action accrued if defendant is a natural person;

(3) in the county of the defendant's principal office in this state, if the defendant is not a natural person; or

(4) if Subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) do not apply, in the county in which the plaintiff resided at the time of the accrual of the cause of action.

(b) For the convenience of the parties and witnesses and in the interest of justice, a court may transfer an action from a county of proper venue under this subchapter or Subchapter C to any other county of proper venue on motion of a defendant filed and served concurrently with or before the filing of the answer, where the court finds:

(1) maintenance of the action in the county of suit would work an injustice to the movant considering the movant's economic and personal hardship;

(2) the balance of interests of all the parties predominates in favor of the action being brought in the other county; and

(3) the transfer of the action would not work an injustice to any other party.

(c) A court's ruling or decision to grant or deny a transfer under Subsection (b) is not grounds for appeal or mandamus and is not reversible error.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Civil Practice & Remedies Code Sec. 15.001 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.003. MULTIPLE PLAINTIFFS AND INTERVENING PLAINTIFFS. (a) In a suit in which there is more than one plaintiff, whether the plaintiffs are included by joinder, by intervention, because the lawsuit was begun by more than one plaintiff, or otherwise, each plaintiff must, independently of every other plaintiff, establish proper venue. If a plaintiff cannot independently establish proper venue, that plaintiff's part of the suit, including all of that plaintiff's claims and causes of action, must be transferred to a county of proper venue or dismissed, as is appropriate, unless that plaintiff, independently of every other plaintiff, establishes that:

(1) joinder of that plaintiff or intervention in the suit by that plaintiff is proper under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure;

(2) maintaining venue as to that plaintiff in the county of suit does not unfairly prejudice another party to the suit;

(3) there is an essential need to have that plaintiff's claim tried in the county in which the suit is pending; and

(4) the county in which the suit is pending is a fair and convenient venue for that plaintiff and all persons against whom the suit is brought.

(b) An interlocutory appeal may be taken of a trial court's determination under Subsection (a) that:

(1) a plaintiff did or did not independently establish proper venue; or

(2) a plaintiff that did not independently establish proper venue did or did not establish the items prescribed by Subsections (a)(1)-(4).

(c) An interlocutory appeal permitted by Subsection (b) must be taken to the court of appeals district in which the trial court is located under the procedures established for interlocutory appeals. The appeal may be taken by a party that is affected by the trial court's determination under Subsection (a). The court of appeals shall:

(1) determine whether the trial court's order is proper based on an independent determination from the record and not under either an abuse of discretion or substantial evidence standard; and

(2) render judgment not later than the 120th day after the date the appeal is perfected.

(d) An interlocutory appeal under Subsection (b) has the effect of staying the commencement of trial in the trial court pending resolution of the appeal.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 15.004. MANDATORY VENUE PROVISIONS GOVERNS MULTIPLE CLAIMS. In a suit in which a plaintiff properly joins two or more claims or causes of action arising from the same transaction, occurrence, or series of transactions or occurrences, and one of the claims or causes of action is governed by the mandatory venue provisions of Subchapter B, the suit shall be brought in the county required by the mandatory venue provision.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.005. MULTIPLE DEFENDANTS. In a suit in which the plaintiff has established proper venue against a defendant, the court also has venue of all the defendants in all claims or actions arising out of the same transaction, occurrence, or series of transactions or occurrences.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.006. VENUE DETERMINED BY FACTS EXISTING AT THE TIME OF ACCRUAL. A court shall determine the venue of a suit based on the facts existing at the time the cause of action that is the basis of the suit accrued.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.007. CONFLICT WITH CERTAIN PROVISIONS. Notwithstanding Sections 15.004, 15.005, and 15.031, to the extent that venue under this chapter for a suit by or against an executor, administrator, or guardian as such, for personal injury, death, or property damage conflicts with venue provisions under the Estates Code, this chapter controls.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 20.001, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. MANDATORY VENUE

Sec. 15.011. LAND. Actions for recovery of real property or an estate or interest in real property, for partition of real property, to remove encumbrances from the title to real property, for recovery of damages to real property, or to quiet title to real property shall be brought in the county in which all or a part of the property is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.0115. LANDLORD-TENANT. (a) Except as provided by another statute prescribing mandatory venue, a suit between a landlord and a tenant arising under a lease shall be brought in the county in which all or a part of the real property is located.

(b) In this section, "lease" means any written or oral agreement between a landlord and a tenant that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, or other provisions relating to the use and occupancy of the real property that is the subject of the agreement.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.012. INJUNCTION AGAINST SUIT. Actions to stay proceedings in a suit shall be brought in the county in which the suit is pending.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.013. INJUNCTION AGAINST EXECUTION OF JUDGMENT. Actions to restrain execution of a judgment based on invalidity of the judgment or of the writ shall be brought in the county in which the judgment was rendered.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.014. HEAD OF STATE DEPARTMENT. An action for mandamus against the head of a department of the state government shall be brought in Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.015. COUNTIES. An action against a county shall be brought in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.0151. CERTAIN POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) Except as provided by a law not contained in this chapter, an action against a political subdivision that is located in a county with a population of 100,000 or less shall be brought in the county in which the political subdivision is located. If the political subdivision is located in more than one county and the population of each county is 100,000 or less, the action shall be brought in any county in which the political subdivision is located.

(b) In this section, "political subdivision" means a governmental entity in this state, other than a county, that is not a state agency. The term includes a municipality, school or junior college district, hospital district, or any other special purpose district or authority.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 733, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 15.016. OTHER MANDATORY VENUE. An action governed by any other statute prescribing mandatory venue shall be brought in the county required by that statute.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.017. LIBEL, SLANDER, OR INVASION OF PRIVACY. A suit for damages for libel, slander, or invasion of privacy shall be brought and can only be maintained in the county in which the plaintiff resided at the time of the accrual of the cause of action, or in the county in which the defendant resided at the time of filing suit, or in the county of the residence of defendants, or any of them, or the domicile of any corporate defendant, at the election of the plaintiff.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.018. FEDERAL EMPLOYERS' LIABILITY ACT. (a) This section only applies to suits brought under the federal Employers' Liability Act (45 U.S.C. Section 51 et seq.).

(b) All suits brought under the federal Employers' Liability Act shall be brought:

(1) in the county in which all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred;

(2) in the county where the defendant's principal office in this state is located; or

(3) in the county where the plaintiff resided at the time the cause of action accrued.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 203 (H.B. 1602), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2007.

Sec. 15.0181. JONES ACT. (a) In this section:

(1) "Coastal county" means:

(A) a county in a coastal area, as defined by Section 33.004, Natural Resources Code; or

(B) a county having a United States Customs port through which waterborne freight is transported.

(2) "Coastal erosion" means the loss of land, marshes, wetlands, beaches, or other coastal features because of the actions of wind, waves, tides, storm surges, subsidence, or other forces.

(3) "Erosion response project" means an action intended to address or mitigate coastal erosion, including beach nourishment, sediment management, beneficial use of dredged material, creation or enhancement of a dune, wetland, or marsh, and construction of a breakwater, bulkhead, groin, jetty, or other structure.

(4) "Gulf Coast state" means Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, or Florida.

(5) "Inland waters" means the navigable waters shoreward of the navigational demarcation lines dividing the high seas from harbors, rivers, the Gulf Intracoastal Waterway, and other inland waters of Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Arkansas, Tennessee, Missouri, Illinois, Kentucky, or Indiana or of Florida along the Gulf of Mexico shoreline of Florida from the Florida-Alabama border down to and including the shoreline of Key West, Florida. The term does not include the Great Lakes.

(b) This section applies only to suits brought under the Jones Act (46 U.S.C. Section 30104).

(c) Except as provided by this section, a suit brought under the Jones Act shall be brought:

(1) in the county where the defendant's principal office in this state is located;

(2) in the county in which all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred; or

(3) in the county where the plaintiff resided at the time the cause of action accrued.

(d) If all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred on the inland waters of this state, ashore in this state, or during the course of an erosion response project in this state, the suit shall be brought:

(1) in the county in which all or a substantial part of the events giving rise to the claim occurred; or

(2) in the county where the defendant's principal office in this state is located.

(e) If all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred on inland waters outside this state, ashore in a Gulf Coast state, or during the course of an erosion response project in a Gulf Coast state, the suit shall be brought:

(1) in the county where the defendant's principal office in this state is located if the defendant's principal office in this state is located in a coastal county;

(2) in Harris County unless the plaintiff resided in Galveston County at the time the cause of action accrued;

(3) in Galveston County unless the plaintiff resided in Harris County at the time the cause of action accrued; or

(4) if the defendant does not have a principal office in this state located in a coastal county, in the county where the plaintiff resided at the time the cause of action accrued.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 203 (H.B. 1602), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.001, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 15.019. INMATE LITIGATION. (a) Except as provided by Section 15.014, an action that accrued while the plaintiff was housed in a facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall be brought in the county in which the facility is located.

(b) An action brought by two or more plaintiffs that accrued while the plaintiffs were housed in a facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall be brought in a county in which a facility that housed one of the plaintiffs is located.

(c) This section does not apply to an action brought under the Family Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 378, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995. Renumbered from Civil Practice and Remedies Code Sec. 15.018 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(3), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 15.020. MAJOR TRANSACTIONS: SPECIFICATION OF VENUE BY AGREEMENT. (a) In this section, "major transaction" means a transaction evidenced by a written agreement under which a person pays or receives, or is obligated to pay or entitled to receive, consideration with an aggregate stated value equal to or greater than $1 million. The term does not include a transaction entered into primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or to settle a personal injury or wrongful death claim, without regard to the aggregate value.

(b) An action arising from a major transaction shall be brought in a county if the party against whom the action is brought has agreed in writing that a suit arising from the transaction may be brought in that county.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an action arising from a major transaction may not be brought in a county if:

(1) the party bringing the action has agreed in writing that an action arising from the transaction may not be brought in that county, and the action may be brought in another county of this state or in another jurisdiction; or

(2) the party bringing the action has agreed in writing that an action arising from the transaction must be brought in another county of this state or in another jurisdiction, and the action may be brought in that other county, under this section or otherwise, or in that other jurisdiction.

(d) This section does not apply to an action if:

(1) the agreement described by this section was unconscionable at the time that it was made;

(2) the agreement regarding venue is voidable under Chapter 272, Business & Commerce Code; or

(3) venue is established under a statute of this state other than this title.

(e) This section does not affect venue and jurisdiction in an action arising from a transaction that is not a major transaction.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 84, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. PERMISSIVE VENUE

Sec. 15.031. EXECUTOR; ADMINISTRATOR; GUARDIAN. If the suit is against an executor, administrator, or guardian, as such, to establish a money demand against the estate which he represents, the suit may be brought in the county in which the estate is administered, or if the suit is against an executor, administrator, or guardian growing out of a negligent act or omission of the person whose estate the executor, administrator, or guardian represents, the suit may be brought in the county in which the negligent act or omission of the person whose estate the executor, administrator, or guardian represents occurred.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.032. INSURANCE. Suit against fire, marine, or inland insurance companies may also be commenced in any county in which the insured property was situated. A suit on a policy may be brought against any life insurance company, or accident insurance company, or life and accident, or health and accident, or life, health, and accident insurance company in the county in which the company's principal office in this state is located or in the county in which the loss has occurred or in which the policyholder or beneficiary instituting the suit resided at the time the cause of action accrued.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.033. BREACH OF WARRANTY BY MANUFACTURER. A suit for breach of warranty by a manufacturer of consumer goods may be brought in any county in which all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred, in the county in which the manufacturer has its principal office in this state, or in the county in which the plaintiff resided at the time the cause of action accrued.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.035. CONTRACT IN WRITING. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), if a person has contracted in writing to perform an obligation in a particular county, expressly naming the county or a definite place in that county by that writing, suit on or by reason of the obligation may be brought against him either in that county or in the county in which the defendant has his domicile.

(b) In an action founded on a contractual obligation of the defendant to pay money arising out of or based on a consumer transaction for goods, services, loans, or extensions of credit intended primarily for personal, family, household, or agricultural use, suit by a creditor on or by reason of the obligation may be brought against the defendant either in the county in which the defendant in fact signed the contract or in the county in which the defendant resides when the action is commenced. No term or statement contained in an obligation described in this section shall constitute a waiver of these provisions.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.038. OTHER PERMISSIVE VENUE. An action governed by any other statute prescribing permissive venue may be brought in the county allowed by that statute.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.039. TRANSIENT PERSON. A transient person may be sued in any county in which he may be found.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 15.062. COUNTERCLAIMS, CROSS CLAIMS, AND THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS. (a) Venue of the main action shall establish venue of a counterclaim, cross claim, or third-party claim properly joined under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure or any applicable statute.

(b) If an original defendant properly joins a third-party defendant, venue shall be proper for a claim arising out of the same transaction, occurrence, or series of transactions or occurrences by the plaintiff against the third-party defendant if the claim arises out of the subject matter of the plaintiff's claim against the original defendant.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.063. TRANSFER. The court, on motion filed and served concurrently with or before the filing of the answer, shall transfer an action to another county of proper venue if:

(1) the county in which the action is pending is not a proper county as provided by this chapter;

(2) an impartial trial cannot be had in the county in which the action is pending; or

(3) written consent of the parties to transfer to any other county is filed at any time.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.064. HEARINGS. (a) In all venue hearings, no factual proof concerning the merits of the case shall be required to establish venue. The court shall determine venue questions from the pleadings and affidavits. No interlocutory appeal shall lie from the determination.

(b) On appeal from the trial on the merits, if venue was improper it shall in no event be harmless error and shall be reversible error. In determining whether venue was or was not proper, the appellate court shall consider the entire record, including the trial on the merits.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.0641. VENUE RIGHTS OF MULTIPLE DEFENDANTS. In a suit in which two or more defendants are joined, any action or omission by one defendant in relation to venue, including a waiver of venue by one defendant, does not operate to impair or diminish the right of any other defendant to properly challenge venue.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.0642. MANDAMUS. A party may apply for a writ of mandamus with an appellate court to enforce the mandatory venue provisions of this chapter. An application for the writ of mandamus must be filed before the later of:

(1) the 90th day before the date the trial starts; or

(2) the 10th day after the date the party receives notice of the trial setting.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 15.065. WATERCOURSE OR ROADWAY FORMING COUNTY BOUNDARY. If a river, watercourse, highway, road, or street forms the boundary line between two counties, the courts of each county have concurrent jurisdiction over the parts of the watercourse or roadway that form the boundary of the county in the same manner as if the watercourse or roadway were in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.066. CONFLICT WITH RULES OF CIVIL PROCEDURE. Subject to Section 22.004, Government Code, to the extent that this chapter conflicts with the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, this chapter controls.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER E. SUITS BROUGHT IN JUSTICE COURT

Sec. 15.081. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies only to suits brought in a justice court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.082. VENUE: GENERAL RULE. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter or by any other law, a suit in justice court shall be brought in the county and precinct in which one or more defendants reside.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.0821. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES FOR TRANSFER. The justices of the peace in each county shall, by majority vote, adopt local rules of administration regarding the transfer of a pending case from one precinct to a different precinct.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 5.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 15.083. RESIDENCE OF A SINGLE MAN. A single man's residence is where he boards.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.084. FORCIBLE ENTRY AND DETAINER. A suit for forcible entry and detainer shall be brought in the precinct in which all or part of the premises is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.085. EXECUTOR; ADMINISTRATOR; GUARDIAN. A suit against an executor, an administrator, or a guardian shall be brought in the county in which the administration or guardianship is pending and in the precinct in which the county seat is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.086. COUNTIES. A suit against a county shall be brought in the precinct in which the county seat of that county is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.087. OPTION: SUIT IN DEFENDANT'S COUNTY OF RESIDENCE. A suit to which a permissive venue section of this subchapter applies may be brought and maintained either in the county provided for by that section or in the county in which the defendant resides.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.088. NONRESIDENT; RESIDENCE UNKNOWN. A suit against a nonresident of this state or against a person whose residence is unknown may be brought in the county and precinct in which the plaintiff resides.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.089. TRANSIENT PERSON. A suit against a transient person may be brought in any county and precinct in which the transient person is found.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.090. PERSONAL PROPERTY. A suit to recover personal property may be brought in the county and precinct in which the property is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.091. RENTS. A suit to recover rents may be brought in the county and precinct in which all or part of the rented premises is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.092. CONTRACT. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a suit on a written contract that promises performance at a particular place may be brought in the county and precinct in which the contract was to be performed.

(b) A suit on an oral or written contract for labor actually performed may be brought in the county and precinct in which the labor was performed.

(c) A suit by a creditor on a contract for goods, services, or loans intended primarily for personal, family, household, or agricultural use may be brought only in the county and precinct in which the contract was signed or in which the defendant resides.

(d) A contract described by Subsection (c) may not waive the venue provided by that subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.093. TORTS. A tort suit for damages may be brought in the county and precinct in which the injury was inflicted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.094. CORPORATION; ASSOCIATION; JOINT-STOCK COMPANY. A suit against a private corporation, association, or joint-stock company may be brought in the county and precinct in which:

(1) all or part of the cause of action arose;

(2) the corporation, association, or company has an agency or representative; or

(3) the principal office of the corporation, association, or company is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.095. RAILROAD COMPANIES; CARRIERS. A suit against a railroad company, a canal company, or the owners of a line of transportation vehicles for injury to a person or property on the railroad, canal, or line of vehicles or for liability as a carrier may be brought in a precinct through which that railroad, canal, or line of vehicles passes or in a precinct in which the route of that railroad, canal, or vehicle begins or ends.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.096. STEAMBOAT OR OTHER VESSEL. A suit against the owner of a steamboat or other vessel may be brought in the county or precinct in which:

(1) the steamboat or vessel may be found;

(2) the cause of action arose; or

(3) the liability accrued or was contracted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.097. INSURANCE COMPANIES. (a) A suit against a fire, marine, or inland marine insurance company may be brought in the county and precinct in which all or part of the insured property was located.

(b) A suit against an accident and life insurance company or association may be brought in the county and precinct in which one or more of the insured persons resided when the injury or death occurred.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.098. PLEADING REQUIREMENTS. If a suit is brought in a county or precinct in which the defendant does not reside, the citation or pleading must affirmatively show that the suit comes within an exception provided for by this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.099. MORE THAN ONE JUSTICE. If there is more than one justice of the peace in a precinct or in an incorporated city or town, suit may be brought before any justice of the peace in that precinct or incorporated city or town.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 15.100. DISQUALIFIED JUSTICE. If the justice in the proper precinct is not qualified to try the suit, suit may be brought before the nearest qualified justice in the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.